Maine, session 132, LD1017.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4311, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. SSSS, §1, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The department shall reimburse each municipality and each Indian tribe 70% of the direct
costs incurred by that municipality or tribe on or after July 1, 2015 for the general assistance
program granted by that municipality or tribe. Beginning January 1, 2026, direct costs
under this subsection include the cost of food provided or served at an emergency shelter.
For the purposes of this subsection, "Indian tribe" has the same meaning as in section 411,
subsection 8‑A.